Washington statutes.
RCW 19.385.010

Unfair or deceptive act and unfair method of competition—Enforced by attorney general.

(1) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) This chapter may be enforced solely by the attorney general under the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2018 c 5 s 2.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2018 c 5: See note following RCW 19.385.020.